Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.06
Examining board; officers; election; duties.

The examining board shall elect from its membership at its annual meeting, officers for the coming year. The officers shall be a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. The duties of the chairperson shall be to preside at all meetings of the examining board. The vice-chairperson shall preside in the absence of the chairperson and shall, with the other officers, fulfill such other duties and obligations as provided in section 81-8,110.07 and the bylaws.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 8.